District of Columbia statutes.
2-1403.07

Injunctive relief.

If, at any time after a complaint has been filed, the Office believes that appropriate civil action to preserve the status quo or to prevent irreparable harm appears advisable, the Office shall certify the matter to the Corporation Counsel, who shall bring, in the name of the District of Columbia, any action necessary to preserve such status quo or to prevent such harm, including the seeking of temporary restraining orders and preliminary injunctions. The appropriate parties shall be notified of such certification and the complainant may initiate independently, or in cooperation with the Corporation Counsel, appropriate civil action to seek a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction.

History

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title III, § 307, 24 DCR 6038

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1403.16.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2547.
1973 Ed., § 6-2287.